es: Ranuras de expansión: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Otros
da: Udvidelsespladser: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Andet
pt-PT: Ranhuras de expansão: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Outro
tr: Genişleme Yuvaları: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Diğer
ko: 확장 슬롯: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; 기타
it: Slot di espansione: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Altro
cs: Sloty pro rozšíření: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Jiné
fi: Laajennuslovet: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Muu
th: ช่องเสียบขยาย: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Слотове за допълнения: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Други
sv: Expansionsplatser: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Annat
pt-BR: Slots de expansão: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Outro
de: Erweiterungssteckplätze: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Sloty na rozšírenie: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Iné
hu: Bővítőhelyek: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Egyéb
hr-HR: Utori za proširenja: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Ostalo
nl: Uitbreidingsslots: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Andere
pl: Gniazda rozszerzeń: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Pozostałe
nb: Utvidelsesspor: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Annen
lt-LT: Išplėtimo lizdai: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; „Mini PCIe“; PCI; „PCIe“; SATA; Kita
sl-SI: Razširitvene reže: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Drugo
ro-RO: Sloturi extindere: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Altele
ja: 拡張スロット: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; その他
en: Expansion slots: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Other
el: Υποδοχές επέκτασης: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Άλλο
vi: Khe cắm mở rộng: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA); Khác
fr: Emplacements d’extension: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini-PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Autre
zh-CN: 扩展插槽: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; 其他
zh-TW: 擴充槽: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; 迷你 PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; 其他
ru: Слоты расширения: AGP; AMR; CNR; DIMM; ISA; M.2; Mini PCIe; PCI; PCIe; SATA; Другой